Massachusetts, session 194th, H1316.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 231. A company shall not require the removal of a tree from the property of a
holder of a homeowners insurance policy if a certified arborist has determined the tree is not a
hazard to the property.
of 1